New York, session 2025-2026, S3309.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 425 of the real property tax law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (f) to read as follows: 3 (f) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 4 sion, where a person who meets the requirements for an enhanced 5 exemption for property owned by senior citizens pursuant to this section 6 purchases property after the levy of taxes, such person may file an 7 application for exemption with the assessor within thirty days of the 8 transfer of title to such person. The assessor shall make a determi- 9 nation of whether or not the parcel would have qualified for exempt 10 status on the tax roll on which the taxes were levied had title to the 11 parcel been in the name of the applicant on the taxable status date 12 applicable to the tax roll. The application shall be on a form 13 prescribed by the commissioner. The assessor, no later than thirty days 14 after receipt of such application, shall notify both the applicant and 15 the board of assessment review, by first class mail, of the exempt 16 amount, if any, and the right of the owner to a review of the exempt 17 amount upon the filing of a written complaint. Such complaint shall be 18 on a form prescribed by the commissioner and shall be filed with the 19 board of assessment review within twenty days of the mailing of this 20 notice. If no complaint is received, the board of assessment review 21 shall so notify the assessor, and the exempt amount determined by the 22 assessor shall be final. If the applicant files a complaint, the board 23 of assessment review shall schedule a time and place for a hearing with 24 respect thereto no later than thirty days after the mailing of the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07507-01-5 S. 3309 2 1 notice by the assessor. The board of assessment review shall meet and 2 determine the exempt amount and shall immediately notify the assessor 3 and the applicant, by first class mail, of its determination. The amount 4 of exemption determined pursuant to this paragraph shall be subject to 5 review as provided in article seven of this chapter. Such a proceeding 6 shall be commenced within thirty days of the mailing of the notice of 7 the board of assessment review to the new owner as provided in this 8 paragraph. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to real 10 property transferred to qualified senior citizens after taxable status 11 dates occurring on or after such date.